sv: Typ av saxblad: Böjd; Mikrospets; Pinking; Kammussla; Sågtandad; Rakt; Övrigt
hu: Ollópenge típusa: Ívelt; Mikrohegy; Recés; Cikk-cakk; Fogazott; Egyenes; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta oštrice škara: Zaobljene; Mikrovrh; Cik-cak; Krojačke; Nazubljene; Ravne; Ostalo
vi: Loại lưỡi kéo: Cong; Đỉnh siêu nhỏ; Kéo có răng cưa; Sò điệp; Khía răng cưa; Tóc thẳng; Khác
de: Scherenklingentyp: Gebogen; Micro-tip; Pinking; Jakobsmuschel; Serrated; Glatt; Sonstiges
ja: ハサミの刃の種類: カーブド; マイクロチップ; ピンキング; ホタテ; セレーテッド; ストレート; その他
ro-RO: Tip lamă foarfecă: Curbată; Micro-vârf; În zig-zag; Rotunjită; Zimțată; Dreaptă; Altele
el: Τύπος λεπίδας ψαλιδιού: Καμπυλωτή; Micro-tip; Ροζ; Χτένι; Οδοντωτή; Ευθεία; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ nožnicovej čepele: Zaoblený; Micro-tip; Entlovacie; Entlovacie; Zúbkovaný; Rovný; Iné
lt-LT: Žirklių ašmenų tipas: Lenktas; Smulkus antgalis; Figūrinės; Banguotos; Dantytos; Tiesios; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta rezila škarij: Ukrivljeno; Mikro konica; Nazobčana; Valovite; Nazobčan; Ravno; Drugo
zh-CN: 剪刀刀片类型: 弯曲的; Micro-Tip; 凹口; 扇贝; 有锯齿; 直; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de lâmina de tesoura: Curvado; Microponta; Ondulada; Vieira; Serrilhada; Liso; Outro
th: ประเภทใบมีดของกรรไกร: โค้ง; ปลายเล็กเป็นพิเศษ; ทิ้งรอยบาก; หอยเชลล์; หยัก; ผมตรง; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de hoja de tijera: Curva; Micro punta; Ondulado; Vieira; Dentado; Liso; Otros
bg-BG: Тип острие на ножица: Извито; Микронакрайник; Пробождащо; Миди; Назъбено; Право; Други
it: Tipo di lama della forbice: Curvo; Micropunta; Rosatura; Smerlatura; Serrata; Dritto; Altro
nl: Type schaarblad: Gebogen; Micro-tip; Pinking; Sint-jakobsschelp; Getand; Steil; Andere
nb: Saksebladtype: Buet; Mikrotupp; Pinking; Kamskjell; Serrert; Rett; Annet
ru: Тип лезвия ножниц: Изогнутые; Микрокончик; Фестонные; Фигурные; Зубчатые; Прямые; Другие
pt-BR: Tipo de lâmina da tesoura: Curvada; Ponta micro; Picotar; Vieira; Serrilhado; Liso; Outro
en: Scissor blade type: Curved; Micro-tip; Pinking; Scallop; Serrated; Straight; Other
fi: Saksien terän tyyppi: Kaareva; Micro-tip; Siksak; Kampasimpukka; Sahalaitainen; Suorat; Muu
ko: 가위날 유형: 곡선형; 마이크로 팁; 핑킹; 스캘럽; 톱니형; 일자형; 기타
zh-TW: 剪刀刀片類型: 弧形; 修剪剪刀; 粉刃; 扇貝; 鋸齒狀; 直; 其他
cs: Typ nůžkové čepele: Zaoblený; Mikrošpička; Řezací; Hřebenatka; Zoubkovaná; Rovné; Jiné
tr: Makas bıçağı türü: Kavisli; Mikro uçlu; Kliket; Tarak kabuğu; Tırtıklı; Düz; Diğer
da: Saksebladtype: Buet; Microspidset; Pinking; Kammusling; Tækket; Lige; Andet
pl: Typ ostrza nożycowego: Zakrzywiony; Mikrokońcówka; Stukające; Przegrzebek; Ząbkowane; Prosta; Inne
fr: Type de lame de ciseaux: Incurvée; Micro-embout; Crantage; Pétoncle; Cranté; Lisses; Autre